Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2272.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4706 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 4706. Prohibition on expenditures for emission inspection program.* * *(h.1) Revised State implementation plan.--(1) Within 60 days after the effective date of this paragraph, the Department of Environmental Protection shall initiate the process to remove a county of the third class that has a population of not less than 215,000 and not more than 216,000 as determined under the most recent Federal decennial census from the enhanced vehicle emission inspection program.(2) No later than January 1, 2027, the Department of 12345678910111213141516171819 Environmental Protection shall complete and submit the revised State implementation plan to the United States Environmental Protection Agency. The revised State implementation plan shall convincingly demonstrate that the county under paragraph (1) can maintain the applicable Federal air quality standards without the emissions reductions attributable to the enhanced vehicle emission inspection program.(3) In revising the State implementation plan under this subsection, the Department of Environmental Protection shall comply with Federal law and shall ensure that the revision will not interfere with attainment of the applicable Federal air quality standards or reasonable further progress toward attainment and will not adversely affect Federal funding.(4) Upon submission of the revised State implementation plan to the United States Environmental Protection Agency under paragraph (2), the Department of Environmental Protection shall notify all of the following:(i) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Environmental Resources and Energy Committee of the Senate.(ii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Environmental and Natural Resource Protection Committee of the House of Representatives.(iii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the Senate.(iv) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the House of Representatives.(5) Upon approval by the United States Environmental Protection Agency of the revised State implementation plan, 20260HB2272PN2972 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the Secretary of Environmental Protection shall transmit notice of the approval to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2272PN2972 - 3 - 123456